Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.030

Pleadings—Forms abolished.

All the forms of pleading in criminal actions heretofore existing, are abolished; and hereafter, the forms of pleading, and the rules by which the sufficiency of pleadings is to be determined, are those prescribed herein.

[Code 1881 s 1002; 1873 p 224 s 185; 1869 p 240 s 180; RRS s 2022.]